New York, session 2025-2026, A10424.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. The public service law is amended by adding a new section 2 28 to read as follows: 3 § 28. Virtual access by the public to commission proceedings and elec- 4 tronic filing of documents. 1. As used in this section: 5 (a) "Document" shall include, but not be limited to, oral and written 6 testimony, exhibits, interrogatories, and motions, briefs, comments, 7 rulings, orders and any other materials filed in or generated as part of 8 a proceeding. 9 (b) "Proceedings" shall mean any formal or informal matter, case, 10 rulemaking, rate proceeding, generic proceeding, or any other action of 11 the commission or the department or any component of a proceeding that 12 may result in decisions by the commission or recommendations to the 13 commission. Such term shall include evidentiary hearings conducted 14 pursuant to section sixty-six of this chapter. 15 2. The commission shall provide for virtual and in-person access and 16 participation for all proceedings regarding gas, electric, combination 17 gas and electric, and water utilities. In the case of settlement negoti- 18 ations, virtual and in-person access and participation shall be limited 19 to persons admitted as parties and who subscribe to the applicable 20 commission rules and standards governing confidentiality. 21 3. The commission and administrative law judges shall accept electron- 22 ic submission of documents in all proceedings and physical copies shall 23 not be required. A filing party shall submit documents in an alternative 24 format only upon certification that electronic submission is not practi- 25 cable. Such documents shall be in a form and manner as prescribed by the 26 commission. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD15088-01-6 A. 10424 2 1 § 2. This act shall take effect on the one hundred twentieth day after 2 it shall have become a law. Effective immediately, the addition, amend- 3 ment and/or repeal of any rule or regulation necessary for the implemen- 4 tation of this act on its effective date are authorized to be made and 5 completed on or before such effective date.